ko: 픽업 커버 소재: 황동; 크롬 도금; 니켈; 니켈 실버; 플라스틱; 스테인리스 스틸; 기타
bg-BG: Материал на капака на адаптера: Месинг; Хромиран; Никел; Алпака; Пластмаса; Неръждаема стомана; Друг
sk-SK: Materiál krytu snímača: Mosadz; Pochrómované; Nikel; Alpaka; Plast; Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Iné
ja: 受取カバー素材: 真鍮; クロムメッキ; ニッケル; ニッケルシルバー (洋白); プラスチック; ステンレス; その他
zh-TW: 拾音器外殼材質: 黃銅; 鍍鉻; 鎳; 白銅; 塑膠; 不鏽鋼; 其他
it: Materiale della copertura del pickup: Ottone; Cromato; Nichel; Alpacca; Plastica; Acciaio inossidabile; Altro
cs: Materiál krytu korby: Mosaz; Pochromované; Nikl; Niklové stříbro; Plast; Nerezová ocel; Ostatní
sl-SI: Material pokrova odjemnika zvoka: Medenina; Kromirano; Nikelj; Novo srebro; Plastika; Nerjavno jeklo; Drugo
el: Υλικό κάλυψης μαγνήτη: Ορείχαλκος; Επιχρωμιωμένο; Νικέλιο; Αλπακάς; Πλαστικό; Ανοξείδωτο ατσάλι; Άλλο
nl: Materiaal pickup-cover: Messing; Verchroomd; Nikkel; Nieuwzilver; Plastic; Roestvrij staal; Overige
es: Material de la cubierta de los micrófonos: Latón; Cromado; Níquel; Alpaca; Plástico; Acero inoxidable; Otro
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำฝาครอบปิ๊กอัพ: ทองเหลือง; ชุบโครเมียม; นิกเกิล; นิกเกิลซิลเวอร์; พลาสติก; สเตนเลสสตีล; อื่นๆ
vi: Chất liệu nắp đậy bộ thu âm: Đồng thau; Mạ crom; Niken; Niken bạc; Nhựa; Thép không gỉ; Khác
nb: Dekselmateriale for pickup: Messing; Forkrommet; Nikkel; Nysølv; Plast; Rustfritt stål; Annet
pt-PT: Material da capa do captador: Latão; Cromado; Níquel; Prata niquelada; Plástico; Aço inoxidável; Outro
ru: Материал крышки звукоснимателя: Латунь; Хромированное покрытие; Никель; Нейзильбер; Пластик; Нержавеющая сталь; Другое
lt-LT: Garso ėmiklių dangtelių medžiaga: Žalvaris; Chromuotas; Nikelis; Naujasidabris; Plastikas; Nerūdijantis plienas; Kita
sv: Material för pickup-lock: Mässing; Förkromad; Nickel; Nysilver; Plast; Rostfritt stål; Övrigt
fr: Matériau de la housse de protection: Laiton; Plaqué chrome; Nickel; Maillechort; Plastique; Acier inoxydable; Autre
tr: Pikap kapak malzemesi: Pirinç; Krom kaplama; Nikel; Nikel gümüş; Plastik; Paslanmaz çelik; Diğer
en: Pickup cover material: Brass; Chrome-plated; Nickel; Nickel silver; Plastic; Stainless steel; Other
ro-RO: Materialul capacului pick-upului: Alamă; Cromat; Nichel; Nichel-argint; Plastic; Oțel inoxidabil; Altele
hr-HR: Materijal poklopca pickupa: Mjed; Kromirano; Nikal; Novo srebro; Plastika; Nehrđajući čelik; Ostalo
hu: Hangszedő bevonat anyaga: Sárgaréz; Krómozott; Nikkel; Újezüst; Műanyag; Rozsdamentes acél; Egyéb
pt-BR: Captador, material da capa: Latão; Cromado; Níquel; Alpaca; Plástico; Aço inoxidável; Outros
pl: Materiał pokrycia przetworników: Mosiądz; Chromowany; Nikiel; Nowe srebro; Plastik; Stal nierdzewna; Inny
da: Materiale i pickupcover: Messing; Forkromet; Nikkel; Nysølv; Plastik; Rustfrit stål; Andet
zh-CN: 拾音器盖材质: 黄铜; 镀铬; 镍; 镍银; 塑料; 不锈钢; 其他
de: Beschichtung des Tonabnehmers: Messing; Verchromt; Nickel; Neusilber; Kunststoff; Edelstahl; Andere
fi: Mikrofonin kansimateriaali: Messinki; Kromattu; Nikkeli; Uushopea; Muovi; Ruostumaton teräs; Muu